New York, session 2025-2026, A5338.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 13.26 to read as follows: 3 § 13.26 Free use of state parks. Notwithstanding the provisions of 4 any other law, family members of individuals who served in the active 5 military, naval or air service during a period of war and died in such 6 service, shall be permitted to use any of the state parks, upon the same 7 terms and conditions as apply to the general public, but without the 8 payment of any fees or other charges for the use of such state park. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. Effective immediately the addition, amendment and/or 11 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 12 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 13 on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06822-01-5